Washington statutes.
RCW 18.35.150

Board of hearing and speech—Created—Membership—Qualifications—Terms—Vacancies—Meetings—Compensation—Travel expenses.

(1) There is created hereby the board of hearing and speech to govern the three separate professions: Hearing aid specialist, audiology, and speech-language pathology. The board shall consist of eleven members to be appointed by the governor.

(2) Members of the board shall be residents of this state. Three members shall represent the public and shall have an interest in the rights of consumers of health services, and shall not be or have been a member of, or married to a member of, another licensing board, a licensee of a health occupation board, an employee of a health facility, nor derive his or her primary livelihood from the provision of health services at any level of responsibility. Two members shall be hearing aid specialists who are licensed under this chapter, have at least five years of experience in the practice of hearing instrument fitting and dispensing, and must be actively engaged in fitting and dispensing within two years of appointment. Two members of the board shall be audiologists licensed under this chapter who have at least five years of experience in the practice of audiology and must be actively engaged in practice within two years of appointment. Two members of the board shall be speech-language pathologists licensed under this chapter who have at least five years of experience in the practice of speech-language pathology and must be actively engaged in practice within two years of appointment. One advisory nonvoting member shall be a speech-language pathology assistant certified in Washington. One advisory nonvoting member shall be a medical physician licensed in the state of Washington.

(3) The term of office of a member is three years. No member shall be appointed to serve more than two consecutive terms. A member shall continue to serve until a successor has been appointed. The governor shall either reappoint the member or appoint a successor to assume the member's duties at the expiration of his or her predecessor's term. A vacancy in the office of a member shall be filled by appointment for the unexpired term.

(4) The chair shall rotate annually among the hearing aid specialists, speech-language pathologists, audiologists, and public members serving on the board. In the absence of the chair, the board shall appoint an interim chair. In event of a tie vote, the issue shall be brought to a second vote and the chair shall refrain from voting.

(5) The board shall meet at least once each year, at a place, day and hour determined by the board, unless otherwise directed by a majority of board members. The board shall also meet at such other times and places as are requested by the department or by three members of the board. A majority of the board members appointed and serving constitutes a quorum for the transaction of board business. The affirmative vote of a majority of a quorum of the board is required to carry a motion or resolution, to adopt a rule, or to pass a measure. Meetings of the board shall be open and public, except the board may hold executive sessions to the extent permitted by chapter 42.30 RCW.

(6) Members of the board shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.265 and shall be reimbursed for their travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. The board is designated as a class five group for purposes of chapter 43.03 RCW.

(7) The governor may remove a member of the board for cause at the recommendation of a majority of the board.

[ 2022 c 240 s 26; 2014 c 189 s 12; 2009 c 301 s 5; 2002 c 310 s 15; 1996 c 200 s 19; 1993 c 313 s 6; 1989 c 198 s 7; 1984 c 287 s 33; 1983 c 39 s 12; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34 s 35; 1973 1st ex.s. c 106 s 15.]

NOTES:

Work group—2014 c 189: See note following RCW 18.35.010.

Intent—Implementation—2009 c 301: See notes following RCW 18.35.010.

Speech-language pathology assistants—Certification requirements—2009 c 301: See note following RCW 18.35.040.

Effective date—2002 c 310: See note following RCW 18.35.010.

Legislative findings—Severability—Effective date—1984 c 287: See notes following RCW 43.03.220.

Effective date—Severability—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34: See notes following RCW 2.08.115.

Secretary of health or designee as ex officio member of health professional licensure and disciplinary boards: RCW 43.70.300.